Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3104
Licensed insurance company; limitation on business.

The business of an insurance company licensed pursuant to sections 44-3101 to 44-3112 shall be limited to making insurance, as provided in section 44-3105, on the risks, hazards, and liabilities of members of an association whose principal practice is located in the State of Nebraska for professional practitioners' errors and omissions or malpractice liability.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 4.